Utah statutes.
78B-1-143.   Witnesses -- Form of oath.

(1)  An oath or affirmation in an action or proceeding may be administered in the following form:

You do solemnly swear (or affirm) that the evidence you shall give in this issue (or matter) pending between ____ and ____ shall be the truth, the whole truth and nothing but the truth, so help you God (or, under the pains and penalties of perjury).

(2)  The person swearing or affirming shall express assent when addressed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

